Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.350

Determination of eligibility for examination for promotion.

Eligibility for examination for promotion shall be determined as follows:

Patrol officers with one year of probationary experience, in addition to three years experience as a regular patrol officer before the date of the first examination occurrence, shall be eligible for examination for the rank of sergeant; patrol officers with one year of probationary experience in the rank of sergeant before the date of the first examination occurrence, in addition to two years as a regular sergeant, shall be eligible for examination for the rank of lieutenant.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5128; 1998 c 193 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 20 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.350. Prior: 1949 c 192 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6362-61c, part.]